Maryland, session 2025, SB0360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–505.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL REPRESENTATION” INCLUDES:
(I) A VISUAL REPRESENTATION CREATED WITHOUT USING
OTHER EXISTING VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OF A PERSON; AND
(II) A VISUAL REPRESENTATION CREATED USING OTHER
EXISTING VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OF A PERSON WITHOUT THE PERSON’S
CONSENT.
(3) “DISTRIBUTE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(4) (I) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON” MEANS THAT AN ORDINARY PERSON WOULD
CONCLUDE THAT THE VISUAL REPRESENTATION IS AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON.
(II) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON” INCLUDES A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION THAT HAS BEEN CREATED, ADAPTED, OR MODIFIED TO APPEAR
GENUINE.
(III) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON” DOES NOT INCLUDE IMAGES OR ITEMS
DEPICTING A PERSON THAT ARE:
1. DRAWINGS;

SENATE BILL 360 3
2. CARTOONS;
3. SCULPTURES; OR
4. PAINTINGS.
(5) “INTIMATE PARTS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(6) “SEXUAL ACTIVITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) A PERSON MAY BRING AND MAINTAIN A CIVIL ACTION FOR DEFAMATION
PER SE AGAINST ANOTHER WHO DISTRIBUTES A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION THAT IS INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON AND FALSELY DEPICTS THE PERSON WITH HIS OR
HER INTIMATE PARTS EXPOSED OR ENGAGED IN SEXUAL ACTIVITY.
(C) IN ADDITION TO OTHER RELIEF, THE COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE
ATTORNEY’S FEES TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF.
Article – Criminal Law
3–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL REPRESENTATION” INCLUDES:
(I) A VISUAL REPRESENTATION CREATED WITHOUT USING
OTHER EXISTING VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OF A PERSON; AND
(II) A VISUAL REPRESENTATION CREATED USING OTHER
EXISTING VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OF A PERSON WITHOUT THE PERSON’S
CONSENT.
(3) (2) “Distribute” means to give, sell, transfer, disseminate, publish,
upload, circulate, broadcast, make available, allow access to, or engage in any other form
of transmission, electronic or otherwise.
[(3)] (4) “Harm” means:
(i) physical injury;
(ii) serious emotional distress; or

SENATE BILL 360
(iii) economic damages.
(5) (I) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND
IDENTIFIABLE PERSON” MEANS THAT AN ORDINARY PERSON WOULD CONCLUDE
THAT THE VISUAL REPRESENTATION IS OF AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON.
(II) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND
IDENTIFIABLE PERSON” INCLUDES A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION THAT HAS BEEN CREATED, ADAPTED, OR MODIFIED TO APPEAR
AS AN ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON.
(III) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND
IDENTIFIABLE PERSON” DOES NOT INCLUDE VISUAL REPRESENTATIONS OR ITEMS
DEPICTING A PERSON THAT ARE:
1. DRAWINGS;
2. CARTOONS;
3. SCULPTURES; OR
4. PAINTINGS.
[(4)] (6) “Intimate parts” means the naked genitals, pubic area, buttocks,
or female nipple.
[(5)] (7) “Sexual activity” means:
(i) sexual intercourse, including genital–genital, oral–genital,
anal–genital, or oral–anal;
(ii) masturbation; or
(iii) sadomasochistic abuse.
(6) (I) “VISUAL REPRESENTATION” OF AN IDENTIFIABLE PERSON
MEANS:
1. AN UNALTERED IMAGE OF THE PERSON; OR
2. AN IMAGE CREATED WITH OR WITHOUT USING OTHER
EXISTING DEPICTIONS OF THE PERSON THAT IS INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM THE
PERSON, FROM THE PERSPECTIVE OF AN ORDINARY PERSON.

SENATE BILL 360 5
(II) “VISUAL REPRESENTATION” INCLUDES A
COMPUTER–GENERATED IMAGE.
(III) “VISUAL REPRESENTATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN IMAGE
OR DEPICTION THAT IS:
1. A DRAWING;
2. A CARTOON;
3. A SCULPTURE; OR
4. A PAINTING.
(b) (1) This section does not apply to:
(i) lawful and common practices of law enforcement, the reporting
of unlawful conduct, or legal proceedings; or
(ii) situations involving voluntary exposure in public or commercial
settings.
(2) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2), is
not liable under this section for content provided by another person.
(c) (1) A person may not knowingly distribute a visual representation of
another identifiable person that displays the other person with his or her intimate parts
exposed or while engaged in an act of sexual activity:
[(1)] (I) with the intent to harm, harass, intimidate, threaten, or coerce
the other person;
[(2) (i)] (II) 1. under circumstances in which the person knew that
the other person did not consent to the distribution; or
[(ii)] 2. with reckless disregard as to whether the person
consented to the distribution; and
[(3)] (III) under circumstances in which the other person had a reasonable
expectation that the image would remain private.
(2) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY DISTRIBUTE A
COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL REPRESENTATION THAT IS INDISTINGUISHABLE
FROM ANOTHER ACTUAL AND IDENTIFIABLE PERSON THAT DISPLAYS THE OTHER

SENATE BILL 360
PERSON WITH HIS OR HER INTIMATE PARTS EXPOSED OR WHILE ENGAGED IN AN ACT
OF SEXUAL ACTIVITY:
(I) WITH THE INTENT TO HARM, HARASS, INTIMIDATE,
THREATEN, OR COERCE THE OTHER PERSON; AND
(II) 1. UNDER CIRCUMSTANCES IN WHICH THE PERSON
KNEW THAT THE OTHER PERSON DID NOT CONSENT TO THE DISTRIBUTION; OR
2. WITH RECKLESS DISREGARD AS TO WHETHER THE
PERSON CONSENTED TO THE DISTRIBUTION.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment not exceeding 2 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(e) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
(f) (1) A PERSON WHOSE VISUAL REPRESENTATION WAS DISTRIBUTED IN
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION HAS A CIVIL CAUSE OF ACTION FOR DEFAMATION PER
SE OR INVASION OF PRIVACY AGAINST ANY PERSON WHO DISTRIBUTED THE VISUAL
REPRESENTATION.
(2) IN ADDITION TO OTHER RELIEF, THE COURT MAY AWARD
REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES TO A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION.
(G) A visual representation AND A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION of a victim that is part of a court record for a case arising from a
prosecution under this section:
(1) subject to item (2) of this subsection, may not be made available for
public inspection; and
(2) except as otherwise ordered by the court, may only be made available
for inspection in relation to a criminal charge OR CIVIL ACTION under this section to:
(i) court personnel;
(ii) a jury in a criminal case brought under this section;
(iii) the State’s Attorney or the State’s Attorney’s designee;
(iv) the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee;
(v) a law enforcement officer;

SENATE BILL 360 7
(vi) THE PLAINTIFF OR THE PLAINTIFF’S ATTORNEY;
(VII) the defendant or the defendant’s attorney; or
(vii) (VIII) the victim or the victim’s attorney.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid for any reason in a
court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or any other
application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application,
and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared severable.
SECTION 3. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.